Florida, session 2026, HB7029.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 28.2225, Florida Statutes, is repealed.
Reviser's note.—The cited section, which relates to a pilot
program for title fraud prevention through identity
verification, was repealed pursuant to its own terms,
effective July 1, 2025.
Section 2. Section 39.4093, Florida Statutes, is repealed.
Reviser's note.—The cited section, which relates to the Task
Force on the Monitoring of Children in Out-of-Home Care,
was repealed pursuant to its own terms, effective June 30,
2025.
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7029-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7029 2026
Section 3. Paragraph (d) of subsection (4) of section
112.061, Florida Statutes, is repealed.
Reviser's note.—The cited paragraph, which relates to an
official headquarters for a Lieutenant Governor for conduct
of state business, expired pursuant to its own terms,
effective July 1, 2025.
Section 4. Section 250.245, Florida Statutes, is repealed.
Reviser's note.—The cited section, which relates to the Florida
National Guard Joint Enlistment Enhancement Program,
expired pursuant to its own terms, effective July 1, 2025.
Section 5. Section 288.8165, Florida Statutes, is
repealed.
Reviser's note.—The cited section, which relates to citizen
support organizations to provide assistance, funding, and
promotional support for the intergovernmental programs of
the Department of State, was repealed pursuant to its own
terms, effective October 1, 2025.
Section 6. Section 316.5501, Florida Statutes, is
repealed.
Reviser's note.—The cited section, which relates to a permitting
program for combination truck tractor, semitrailer, and
trailer combination coupled as a single unit subject to
certain requirements, automatically expired pursuant to its
own terms, effective January 1, 2025, unless reauthorized
by the Legislature; the program was not reauthorized.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7029-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7029 2026
Section 7. Subsection (4) of section 320.08053, Florida
Statutes, is repealed.
Reviser's note.—The cited subsection, which relates to extension
of the presale period for the Florida State Beekeepers
Association specialty license plate for an additional 12
months, expired pursuant to its own terms, effective July
1, 2025.
Section 8. Paragraph (b) of subsection (3) and subsection
(5) of section 321.04, Florida Statutes, are repealed.
Reviser's note.—Paragraph (3)(b), which relates to assignment of
one or more patrol officers to the office of the Lieutenant
Governor for security services for the 2024-2025 fiscal
year only, and subsection (5), which relates to assignment
of a patrol officer to a Cabinet member under specified
circumstances for the 2024-2025 fiscal year, expired
pursuant to their own terms, effective July 1, 2025.
Section 9. Subsection (4) of section 339.08, Florida
Statutes, is repealed.
Reviser's note.—The cited subsection, which relates to
appropriation of funds, for the 2023-2024 and 2024-2025
fiscal years only, to the State Transportation Trust Fund
from the General Revenue Fund and the Discretionary Sales
Surtax Clearing Trust Fund as provided in the General
Appropriations Act, expired pursuant to its own terms,
effective July 1, 2025.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7029-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7029 2026
Section 10. Subsection (16) of section 455.213, Florida
Statutes, is repealed.
Reviser's note.—The cited subsection, which waives 50 percent of
the initial licensing fee for an applicant applying for an
initial license for a profession under chapter 455 for the
2023-2024 and 2024-2025 fiscal years, expired pursuant to
its own terms, effective July 1, 2025.
Section 11. Subsection (8) of section 553.80, Florida
Statutes, is repealed.
Reviser's note.—The cited subsection, which prohibits raising
building inspection fees by local governments located in
areas designated by the Federal Emergency Management Agency
disaster declarations for Hurricane Ian or Hurricane Nicole
before October 1, 2024, expired pursuant to its own terms,
effective June 30, 2025.
Section 12. Subsection (10) of section 1004.6495, Florida
Statutes, is repealed.
Reviser's note.—The cited subsection, which requires
establishment, no later than August 31, 2024, by the Board
of Governors and the State Board of Education, in
consultation with the Florida Center for Students with
Unique Abilities, of a state Classification of Instruction
Program code for Florida Postsecondary Comprehensive
Transition Programs established pursuant to the section,
100 expired pursuant to its own terms, effective July 1, 2025.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7029-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7029 2026
101 Section 13. Subsection (14) of section 1008.22, Florida
102 Statutes, is repealed.
103 Reviser's note.—The cited subsection, which relates to an
104 independent review and recommendations relating to the
105 coordinated screening and progress monitoring system under
106 s. 1008.25(9), was repealed pursuant to its own terms,
107 effective July 1, 2025.
108 Section 14. Subsection (7) of section 1008.34, Florida
109 Statutes, is repealed.
110 Reviser's note.—The cited subsection, which relates to providing
111 a transition and requirements for calculation of school and
112 district grades for the 2022-2023 school year, exempting
113 certain schools from specified provisions, and requirements
114 for determining grade 3 retention and high school
115 graduation for the school year, was repealed pursuant to
116 its own terms, effective July 1, 2025.
117 Section 15. Subsection (7) of section 1008.341, Florida
118 Statutes, is repealed.
119 Reviser's note.—The cited subsection, which provides that school
120 improvement ratings will not be calculated for the 2022-
121 2023 school year, and that the State Board of Education
122 shall set a specified scale of ratings pursuant to rule
123 upon the availability of learning gains data in the 2023-
124 2024 school year, was repealed pursuant to its own terms,
125 effective July 1, 2025.
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7029-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7029 2026
126 Section 16. This act shall take effect on the 60th day
127 after adjournment sine die of the session of the Legislature in
128 which enacted.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7029-00